Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1818
Potato inspection; director; powers.

The director is empowered to make all arrangements to implement the inspection service or terminate existing inspection service following entry of an order establishing or terminating such services and to this extent he is authorized to appoint persons or designate agents as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the department and to expend such funds as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of sections 2-1813 to 2-1825. The director may require that all persons assigned to inspection and grading duties possess a federal potato inspector's license.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 10, p. 189.